Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-819
Laboratory tests; fee.

The fee, required by any state or other laboratory for any analysis or test made by any prospective vendor prior to the award of a contract, shall be paid by such prospective vendor.

Laws 1943, c. 215, § 12, p. 708;

R.S.1943, § 81-156;

R.S.1943, (2014), § 81-156;

Laws 2024, LB461, § 19.